Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.120

Early childhood court programs—Evaluation—Provision of assistance.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the administrative office of the courts shall perform, or contract for, an evaluation of the early childhood court program to ensure the quality, accountability, and fidelity of the programs' evidence-based treatment. Any evaluation of the early childhood court program shall be posted on the administrative office of the courts website.

(2) The administrative office of the courts may provide, or contract for the provision of, training and technical assistance related to program services, consultation and guidance for difficult cases, and ongoing training for court teams.

[ 2021 c 285 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 285: See note following RCW 2.30.100.